Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1823
Metropolitan transit authority; transportation system; modernization; depreciation policy.

It shall be the duty of the board, as promptly as possible, to rehabilitate, reconstruct, and modernize all portions of any transportation system acquired, and to maintain at all times an adequate and modern transportation system suitable and adapted to the needs of the county, city, or village served by the authority, and for safe, comfortable, convenient, and expeditious service. To assure modern, attractive transportation service the board may establish a depreciation policy which makes provision for the continuous and prompt replacement of worn out and obsolete property and the board may make provision for such depreciation of the property of the authority as is not offset by current expenditures for maintenance, repairs, and replacements, under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the board.

Laws 1957, c. 23, § 23, p. 174;

Laws 1972, LB 1275, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 720, § 7.